Tennessee statutes. Title 70 Wildlife Resources
Part 2 Miscellaneous Licenses and Permits
70-2-221. Fish dealers license — Requirements — Fees — Penalties. [See the Compiler's Notes.]

Any person, firm or corporation, before engaging in the businesses described in this section, must purchase a fish dealer's license:

A “bait dealer” engages in the business of capturing legal species of fish or other aquatic life for the purpose of sale or the selling of legal species of fish and other aquatic life for bait;

Each bait dealer shall make a monthly report to the executive director on forms provided as to the number of minnows sold and shall indicate the source of supply of such minnows; provided, that the executive director may, in the executive director's discretion, require only those monthly reports that the executive director may deem necessary; and

The wildlife resources agency is empowered to inspect any shipment of live minnows, and if found diseased, may cause the shipment to be destroyed without being liable for damage for such destruction;

“Catch-out operation” is the business of making legal species of fish placed in a pond, tank, or other constructed container available to persons wishing to procure them by purchase;

“Fish farming” is the business of rearing for sale legal species of fish and other aquatic life or the selling of legal species of fish and other aquatic life reared in private facilities; and

Fish used in the catch-out business must be reared fish or must be wild commercial fish species obtained legally by commercial fishers, and must be approved by the agency. Fish to be purchased may be caught by persons using legal fishing methods without the requirement of a fishing license.

These businesses shall be operated under rules and regulations promulgated by the wildlife resources agency.

The fee for a resident license shall be twenty dollars ($20.00); the fee for a nonresident license shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The license will expire on the last day of February each year.

Each license issued shall cover all operations of a single business conducted within the exterior boundaries of the same tract of land owned or leased by the person, firm or corporation.

Any person, firm or corporation violating this section commits a Class C misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

Acts 1989, ch. 486, § 10; 1994, ch. 727, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The words “Class C” have been added in (e) by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. For the most up-to-date fee schedule, refer to the Tennessee wildlife resources agency website at http://www.tn.gov/twra/.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-2-222. Freshwater mussels — Purchase — Payment — Penalty. [See the Compiler's Notes.]

Any person, firm or corporation that purchases or otherwise obtains freshwater mussels taken from Tennessee waters shall pay to the Tennessee wildlife resources agency the amount equal to $0.0145 per pound of mussel shells or $0.0124 per pound of mussels, shell with meat, purchased or obtained.

The payment to the agency shall be calculated from receipts filled out by the buyer for each transaction. A copy of each receipt will be given to the seller and a copy retained by the buyer, and shall be made available by the buyer for inspection by agents of the agency or the office of the comptroller of the treasury for a period of two (2) years. When mussels are sold without first going through a buyer, the method of payment shall be as described in proclamations promulgated by the fish and wildlife commission. For purposes of this section, a “buyer” is any person, firm or corporation that buys or otherwise obtains mussels from mussel harvesters or other mussel buyers, either for use within the state or for exporting from Tennessee.

Payments from buyers shall be made monthly, and must be received by the agency no later than the fifteenth day of the following month.

Revenue from this section shall be used for mussel management, research, and enforcement. However, no more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the total revenue shall be spent on enforcement.

A violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1991, ch. 522, § 1; 1994, ch. 727, §§ 2-4; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. For the most up-to-date fee schedule, refer to the Tennessee wildlife resources agency website at http://www.tn.gov/twra/.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-2-223. Mussel industry — Advisory group.

To enhance and protect the state's mussel industry, the governor is authorized to appoint a five-member group of mussel industry representatives to advise the fish and wildlife commission and the various agencies of state government on pertinent matters relating to policy development and enforcement. The terms of such members shall run concurrently with the term of the appointing governor.

Acts 1991, ch. 522, § 2; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

70-2-224. Regulation of sport firing ranges.

The fish and wildlife commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations establishing procedures and guidelines for the operation of wildlife resources agency sport firing ranges and establishing fees for use by the general public. The wildlife resources agency is authorized to contract for the operation and maintenance of the facilities. Moneys derived from the fees shall be deposited in the wildlife resources fund. The fee provisions of this section do not apply to outdoor sport firing ranges in operation prior to July 1, 1998.

Acts 1998, ch. 1044, § 1; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

70-2-225. Authority of commission to promulgate rules and regulations.

The commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations establishing permit fees for camping and other recreational activities on public lands under the agency's management or control and on agency lakes.

Acts 2000, ch. 837, § 5.

70-2-226. Permits for use of Sundquist wildlife management area by certain residents.

Notwithstanding § 70-2-225 or any other provision of this title to the contrary, persons residing either within the boundaries of the Sundquist wildlife management area or on property physically contiguous to such area on July 1, 2004, shall be issued a user permit by the Tennessee wildlife resources agency (TWRA) for horseback riding, bicycling, and off highway vehicle use. Application must be made to the TWRA on the form provided by the agency and such proof of residency provided as specified by the agency within ninety (90) days of June 7, 2004.

Subsection (a) shall not apply to persons who purchase, inherit, or reside on property within or physically contiguous to the Sundquist wildlife management area after July 1, 2004.

The estimated cost of this section shall be absorbed out of the existing resources of the TWRA.

Acts 2004, ch. 870, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 95, § 1.